Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6155.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17227. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a licensed practical nurse may perform an intravenous therapy procedure described in this section if all of the following apply: (a) The licensed practical nurse is qualified by education, training, or experience to perform the intravenous therapy procedure, as evidenced by the successful completion of a course approved by the board. The course must be not less than 20 hours in duration and include didactic instruction and clinical experience. (b) The licensed practical nurse is under the supervision of a registered professional nurse, physician, or dentist at the time the intravenous therapy procedure is performed. (2) The intravenous therapy procedures that may be performed under subsection (1) include all of the following: (a) The insertion of a peripheral intravenous catheter into a vein of the hand, forearm, or antecubital fossa. (b) The initiation and maintenance of peripheral intravenous infusions, including normal saline, lactated ringer's solution, dextrose solution, or other isotonic maintenance fluids, as determined by the board by rule. (c) The administration of intravenous antibiotic medications through a peripheral intravenous line, as ordered by a prescriber. (d) Flushing peripheral intravenous devices with saline or heparin solution. (e) The discontinuation or removal of a peripheral intravenous catheter. (f) The assessment of peripheral intravenous infusion sites and monitoring for complications, including infiltration or phlebitis. (3) A licensed practical nurse shall not perform any of the following under this section: (a) The insertion or discontinuation of a central venous catheter. (b) The insertion or discontinuation of a peripherally inserted central catheter. (c) The initiation or administration of blood or blood products. (d) The initiation of chemotherapy or antineoplastic medications. (e) The initiation of total parenteral nutrition. (4) As used in this section, "prescriber" means that term as defined in section 17708.